Connecticut, session 2026, HB05040.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 17b-191 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(b) The state-administered general assistance program shall provide
cash assistance of [(1)] two hundred sixty-nine dollars per month [for an
unemployable person upon determination of such person's
unemployability; (2) two hundred dollars per month for a transitional
person who is required to pay for shelter; and (3) fifty dollars per month
for a transitional person who is not required to pay for shelter] to
persons eligible for the program. The standard of assistance paid for
individuals residing in rated boarding facilities shall remain at the level
in effect on August 31, 2003. No person shall be eligible for cash
assistance under the program if eligible for cash assistance under any
other state or federal cash assistance program. The standards of
assistance set forth in this subsection shall be subject to annual increases,
as described in subsection (b) of section 17b-104.
Sec. 2. Subsection (f) of section 17b-274d of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5040
2026):
(f) Nonpreferred drugs in the classes of drugs included on the
preferred drug lists shall be subject to prior authorization. Prior
authorization is not required for any mental-health-related drug that
has been filled or refilled, in any dosage, at least one time in the one-
year period prior to the date the individual presents a prescription for
the drug at a pharmacy. If prior authorization is granted for a drug not
included on a preferred drug list, the authorization shall be valid for one
year from the date the prescription is first filled. [Antiretroviral classes
of drugs shall not be included on the preferred drug lists.]
Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of Social
Services may periodically review available data on the clinical
effectiveness of outpatient prescription drugs covered under the
Medicaid program that are projected to exceed (1) a net cost per
consumer, after factoring in rebates, of twenty-five thousand dollars per
year, or (2) an annual aggregate cost, after factoring in rebates to the
medical assistance program, of ten million dollars. The commissioner
may, within available appropriations, contract with a third party to
conduct a comparative effectiveness review of any such outpatient
prescription drug. For purposes of this section, "rebate" means an
amount sent to the state by a prescription drug manufacturer to offset
the cost of outpatient prescription drugs covered by the Medicaid
program.
(b) Any such comparative effectiveness review shall include, but
need not be limited to: (1) Clinical efficacy and outcomes; (2)
information relating to the pricing of the outpatient prescription drug,
including, but not limited to, information relating to prices paid by other
states or developed nations; (3) such drug's net price to the Medicaid
program as compared to its therapeutic benefits, including, but not
limited to, the seriousness and prevalence of the disease or condition
that is treated by the drug; (4) the extent of utilization of such drug; (5)
the likelihood that the use of such drug will reduce the need for other
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5040
medical care; (6) the number of manufacturers that produce such drug;
and (7) whether there are pharmaceutical equivalents of such drug.
(c) The Commissioner of Social Service may make public and share
the results of any comparative effectiveness review with any entity,
including any multistate prescription drug purchasing collaborative in
which the state is a participating member, in order to negotiate
additional supplemental rebate agreements beyond any rebates
required under federal law.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-191(b)
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 17b-274d(f)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 3(a)(2) and 3(b), references to "prescription drugs" were
changed to "outpatient prescription drugs" or "such drug" for
consistency, and the provisions of Section 3(c) were rewritten for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3